Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-107
Felony or misdemeanor, defined outside of code; how treated.

(1) Any felony or misdemeanor defined by state statute outside of this code without specification of its class shall be punishable as provided in the statute defining it, or as otherwise provided by law outside of this code, except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(2) A felony defined by statute outside this code, without classification, the sentence for which exceeds the sentence authorized in this code for a Class III felony, shall constitute for sentencing purposes a Class III felony. A person adjudged guilty under such law is deemed to be convicted of a Class III felony and shall be sentenced for a felony of that class in accordance with this code.

(3) A misdemeanor defined by a statute outside this code, the sentence for which exceeds the sentence authorized in this code for a Class I misdemeanor, shall constitute for sentencing purposes a Class I misdemeanor. A person adjudged guilty under such law is deemed to be convicted of a Class I misdemeanor and shall be sentenced for a Class I misdemeanor in accordance with this code.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 7.

The proper determination of punishment for fourth offense driving under the influence of an alcoholic liquor or drug is governed by section 28-106(1) and not subsection (3) of this section. State v. Schultz, 252 Neb. 746, 566 N.W.2d 739 (1997).